Utah statutes.
41-6a-1606.   Load extending beyond rear of vehicle -- Duty to display lamps and reflectors or flag.

(1)  If a load on a vehicle extends to the rear four feet or more beyond the bed or body of the vehicle, the operator shall display lamps, reflectors, or flags at the extreme rear end of the load in accordance with this section.

(2)  During hours of darkness as specified in Section 41-6a-1603, the following shall be displayed:

(a)  two red reflectors located so as to indicate maximum width; and

(b)  two red lamps, one on each side with one red lamp located so as to indicate maximum overhang.

(3) (a)  At a time other than the time indicated under Subsection (2), on a vehicle having a load which extends beyond its sides or more than four feet beyond its rear, red flags shall be displayed marking the extremities of the load, at each point where a lamp or reflector is required under Subsection (2).

(b)  The red flags shall be at least 12 inches square.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

